Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Opening, Closing or Changing Public Roads

54-10-201. Changing or closing roads — Application by petition.

All applications to open, change, or close a road shall be made by written petition, signed by the applicant, to the commissioner of the district through which the road runs or is asked to be located, specifying in particular the changes or action asked; or, if the road extends into two (2) or more districts, or is the dividing line between districts, then to the commissioners of the districts.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1620; Code 1932, § 2730; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-905.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Private Ways, § 3; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 52.

Cited: Vinson v. Nashville, C. & S. L. Ry., 45 Tenn. App. 161, 321 S.W.2d 841, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958); Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978); Montgomery v. Carter County, 226 F.3d 758, 2000 FED App. 325P, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 23383 (6th Cir. Tenn. 2000).

54-10-202. Notice to interested parties of action to open or close.

No road shall be opened, changed, or closed, without giving at least five-days' notice to all interested parties of the time the road or roads are to be opened, changed, or closed, and a surveyor or civil engineer may be employed, if necessary, to locate the interested parties. Landowners and those controlling land touched by the proposed highway shall be deemed interested parties.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1621; Code 1932, § 2731; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-906.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, §§ 7, 10, 55.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978); Lawrence County v. Shaffer, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 66 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 12, 2009).

54-10-203. Nonresident landowners notified.

If any owner of the land affected by the opening, changing, or closing of a public highway is a nonresident, then notice to the owner's agent or attorney, if the owner's agent or attorney resides in the county, shall be sufficient. If there is no such agent or attorney, then the notice shall be made by publication for four (4) consecutive weeks in the newspaper having the greatest circulation in the county, the last publication to be at least one (1) week before the hearing.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1622; Code 1932, § 2732; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-907.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-204. Jury of view — Members — Oath.

Where the opening, changing, or closing of a public highway only affects one (1) commissioner's district, the commissioner shall associate with two (2) other freeholders of the district with whom the commissioner has never consulted on the question involved, and who shall be in no way related to the parties affected by the opening, changing, or closing of the highway, and who shall take and subscribe to an oath before the commissioner to act without favor or partiality in the matter, whose oaths, thus subscribed, shall become part of the record, upon appeal being taken.

The commissioner and two (2) freeholders shall constitute a jury of view.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1623; Code 1932, § 2733; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-908.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 220; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 7.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-205. Damages — Payment.

The jury of view has the power of condemnation and to assess damages, which shall be paid out of the general funds raised for county purposes, upon the order of the commissioner on the county mayor, who shall issue a warrant if the county mayor approves the order.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1624; Code 1932, § 2734; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-909; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Acquiring lands and rights-of-way for roads by eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 8.

Survey of roads to ascertain needed improvements, § 54-10-105.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-206. Appeals from action of jury of view.

Any person aggrieved by the action of the jury of view may appeal to the court of general sessions, and from there to the circuit and appellate courts.

In case of an appeal, the jury of view shall forward all the papers in the case, with its action on the case, to the court of general sessions to which appeal was made.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1625; mod. Code 1932, § 2735; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-910.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 30, 45; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-207. Costs and damages accruing in suit — Payment.

All costs accruing in the suit shall be paid by the appellant, if the action of the jury of view is sustained by the court giving final decision, unless for good reason it should otherwise order.

Should the case be decided against the action of the jury of view, then all costs and any additional damages assessed by the court shall be paid out of the general fund raised for the current county purposes.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1626; Code 1932, § 2736; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-911.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-208. Action after final judgment.

If the action of the jury of view be affirmed, the commissioner or commissioners shall then proceed as if no appeal had been taken; if otherwise, the order of the court shall be carried out.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1627; Code 1932, § 2737; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-912.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-209. Bond for appeal costs.

All persons appealing from the decision of a jury of view to any court having jurisdiction of the matter shall execute a bond for the costs of the suit.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1628; Code 1932, § 2738; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-913.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 63.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-210. Attorney for county upon appeal.

In case of an appeal, the district attorney general shall attend to the case for the county in the circuit court, and shall be paid the sum of five dollars ($5.00) for each case attended to, to accrue to the state, and the attorney general and reporter shall represent the county in the cases before the appellate courts.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1629; mod. Code 1932, § 2739; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-914.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-211. Compensation of jury of view.

The jury of view each shall receive two dollars ($2.00) per day for services, which, with other costs and damages accruing on the opening, changing or closing of roads, shall be paid out of the general county funds, upon the order of the commissioner upon the county mayor, upon which the county mayor shall issue a warrant, subject always to the county mayor's approval.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1630; mod. Code 1932, § 2740; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-915; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cited: Hargis v. Collier, 578 S.W.2d 953, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 332 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978).

54-10-212. Waiver of damage by landowners.

When landowners and those controlling land touched by the highway proposed to be opened, changed or closed waive, in writing, any claim for damages sustained by the opening, changing or closing, then the commissioner or commissioners shall proceed, independently of a jury of view, to execute the particular action asked in the petition, if, in their discretion, they think the public interest will not be materially injured by the action.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1631; Code 1932, § 2741; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-916.

54-10-213. Commissioner may act without petition.

The commissioner may, without petition or application, proceed to open, change, close and construct any public highway that the commissioner deems necessary for the public interest.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1632; Code 1932, § 2742; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-917.

54-10-214. Jury of view in joint districts.

Where any two (2) road districts are involved in any question requiring a jury of view, the two (2) commissioners and one (1) freeholder shall constitute the jury.

Where three (3) or more districts are involved, then the commissioners of all the districts interested shall constitute the jury of view, and no commissioner shall be required to take an oath before serving on the jury of view.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 14; Shan., § 1633; Code 1932, § 2743; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-918.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Sreets and Highways, § 7.

54-10-215. Controversy to be heard at first term.

The court in which any suit or controversy for establishing a ferry or laying out a road is pending shall hear and determine it at the first term after it is docketed.

Code 1858, § 1193 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 35, § 1); Shan., § 1633a1; mod. Code 1932, § 2744; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-919.

54-10-216. Alternative procedure for opening, changing, and closing of public roads in county that are not maintained by any other governmental entity.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, a county legislative body, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote, may adopt the provisions of this subsection (a) as an alternative procedure for the opening, changing, and closing of public roads in the county that are not maintained by any other governmental entity. After adopting this subsection (a), each application to open, change, or close a designated public road in the county shall be made in writing to the chief administrative officer. Upon receiving an application to open, change, or close a public road, the chief administrative officer shall give notice to interested parties as provided in this part. The chief administrative officer shall make a recommendation to the regional planning commission, or a committee of the county legislative body if no such regional planning commission exists, regarding whether the public road should be opened, changed, or closed. Before making any recommendation with respect to opening, changing, or closing a road pursuant to this subsection (a), the regional planning commission, or committee of the county legislative body, shall provide notice of the action either by written notice mailed to affected property owners or by notice advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than fourteen (14) days before the recommendation is made. After receiving the recommendation of the chief administrative officer, the regional planning commission or committee of the county legislative body shall make its recommendation to the county legislative body and shall attach the recommendation of the chief administrative officer. After receiving the recommendations as provided in this subsection (a), the county legislative body may, by resolution adopted by a majority of its members, order the opening, changing, or closure of the public road.

The committee of the county legislative body formed pursuant to subsection (a) shall be a standing committee of the county legislative body comprised of five (5) county legislative body members selected by the chair of the county legislative body each year on or before September 1. The committee shall only be formed if no regional planning commission exists to perform the functions under subsection (a) and shall operate for the sole purpose of considering applications to open, change, or close a county road and for no other purpose.

Adoption of the alternative procedure provided in subsection (a) does not preclude interested parties from seeking damages arising from the opening, changing, or closing of a county road to which they are otherwise entitled under the law.

As used in this section, “change”, with respect to the changing of public roads, does not include any proposed or actual reduction of the maximum gross weight limits of freight motor vehicles operating over public roads.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede § 55-7-205(a)(8). To the extent that this section is in conflict with § 55-7-205(a)(8), § 55-7-205(a)(8) controls.

Acts 1995, ch. 478, § 1; 2020, ch. 585, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote present (a), which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of this part to the contrary, a county legislative body, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote, may adopt the provisions of this section as an alternative procedure for the closing of public roads in the county that are not maintained by any other governmental entity. After adopting the provisions of this section, each application to close a designated public road in the county shall be made in writing to the chief administrative officer. Upon receiving an application to close a public road, the chief administrative officer shall give notice to interested parties as provided in this part. The chief administrative officer shall make a recommendation to the regional planning commission regarding whether or not the public road should be closed. Before making any recommendation with respect to closing a road pursuant to this section, the regional planning commission shall provide notice of the action either by written notice mailed to affected property owners or by notice advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than fourteen (14) days before the recommendation is made. After receiving the recommendation of the chief administrative officer, the regional planning commission shall make its recommendation to the county legislative body, and shall attach the recommendation of the chief administrative officer. After receiving the recommendations as provided in this section, the county legislative body may, by resolution adopted by a majority of its members, order the closure of the public road.”; and added (b)-(e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 585, § 2. March 20, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. County highway superintendent's duties, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).

Authority to hire and fire county highway department employees, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).